Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.010

Directors—Number—Vacancies.

The business and affairs of every association shall be managed and controlled by a board of not less than seven nor more than fifteen directors, a majority of which shall not be officers or employees of the association. The persons designated in the articles of incorporation shall be the first directors.

Vacancies in the board of directors shall be filled by vote of the members at the annual meetings or at a special meeting called for the purpose. The board of directors may fill vacancies occurring on the board, such appointees to serve until the next annual meeting of the members.

[ 1947 c 257 s 1; 1945 c 235 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3717-133. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 11; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 3; 1919 c 169 s 3; 1913 c 110 s 4; 1890 p 56 s 32.]